Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Representative Districts
5.238.
Thirty-eighth Representative District.

The Thirty-eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

A123 - Precinct 123 28 District

A131 - Precinct 131 28 District

A135 - Precinct 135 28 District

A140 - Precinct 140 28 District

I110 - Precinct 110 37 District

I111 - Precinct 111 37 District

I122 - Precinct 122 37 District

I125 - Precinct 125 37 District

I140 - Precinct 140 37 District

I156 - Precinct 156 37 District

J105 - Precinct 105 38 District

J108 - Precinct 108 38 District

J111 - Precinct 111 38 District

J113 - Precinct 113 38 District

J117 - Precinct 117 38 District

J119 - Precinct 119 38 District

J120 - Precinct 120 38 District

J122 - Precinct 122 38 District

J123 - Precinct 123 38 District

J135 - Precinct 135 38 District

J137 - Precinct 137 38 District

J138 - Precinct 138 38 District

J140 - Precinct 140 38 District

J142 - Precinct 142 38 District

J143 - Precinct 143 38 District

J145 - Precinct 145 38 District

J150 - Precinct 150 38 District

J152 - Precinct 152 38 District

J153 - Precinct 153 38 District

K138 - Precinct 138 40 District

K139 - Precinct 139 40 District

K144 - Precinct 144 40 District

K145 - Precinct 145 40 District

K146 - Precinct 146 40 District

K147 - Precinct 147 40 District

K148 - Precinct 148 40 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
38, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
38, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
38, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 76, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 38, effective January 20, 2022.

5.239.
Thirty-ninth Representative District.

The Thirty-ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

B179 - Fairhaven

B202 - Pinnacle

B204 - Atwood

B209 - Charwood

B210 - Fiddler Creek

B218 - Laurelwood

B221 - Magnolia Gardens

B224 - Windstar

B227 - Silverbell

C179 - Brandywine

C182 - Kenesaw Village

C190 - Amherst

C215 - Four Wynds

County: Jessamine KY (part)

A101 - East Nicholasville #1

A102 - East Nicholasville #2

A103 - West Nicholasville #1

A104 - West Nicholasville #2

A105 - West Nicholasville #3

A106 - Keene Place #1

A107 - Keene Place #2

B101 - Marble Creek #1

B102 - Marble Creek #2

B103 - Marble Creek #3

B104 - The Vineyard

B105 - The Orchard

C103 - Maple Leaf

C104 - S.E. Nicholasville #1

C105 - Southbrook

D102 - Paddock

F101 - S.W. Nicholasville #1

F105 - S.W. Nicholasville #5

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
39, effective January 8, 1992; 1992, ch. 369, § 4, effective January 1, 1993; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
39, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
39, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 77, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 39, effective January 20, 2022.

5.240.
Fortieth Representative District.

The Fortieth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

H114 - Precinct 114 35 District

H115 - Precinct 115 35 District

H153 - Precinct 153 35 District

I107 - Precinct 107 37 District

I109 - Precinct 109 37 District

J101 - Precinct 101 38 District

J104 - Precinct 104 38 District

J107 - Precinct 107 38 District

J130 - Precinct 130 38 District

J146 - Precinct 146 38 District

J147 - Precinct 147 38 District

J154 - Precinct 154 38 District

K110 - Precinct 110 40 District

K111 - Precinct 111 40 District

K112 - Precinct 112 40 District

K113 - Precinct 113 40 District

K114 - Precinct 114 40 District

K116 - Precinct 116 40 District

K117 - Precinct 117 40 District

K118 - Precinct 118 40 District

K119 - Precinct 119 40 District

K122 - Precinct 122 40 District

K123 - Precinct 123 40 District

K125 - Precinct 125 40 District

K131 - Precinct 131 40 District

K134 - Precinct 134 40 District

K135 - Precinct 135 40 District

K136 - Precinct 136 40 District

K137 - Precinct 137 40 District

K140 - Precinct 140 40 District

K141 - Precinct 141 40 District

K142 - Precinct 142 40 District

K143 - Precinct 143 40 District

K150 - Precinct 150 40 District

K151 - Precinct 151 40 District

M105 - Precinct 105 42 District

M130 - Precinct 130 42 District

M148 - Precinct 148 42 District

M166 - Precinct 166 42 District

M169 - Precinct 169 42 District

M170 - Precinct 170 42 District

M171 - Precinct 171 42 District

O123 - Precinct 123 44 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
40, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
40, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
40, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 78, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 40, effective January 20, 2022.

5.241.
Forty-first Representative District.

The Forty-first Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

C122 - Precinct 122 30 District

C125 - Precinct 125 30 District

D110 - Precinct 110 31 District

D130 - Precinct 130 31 District

D131 - Precinct 131 31 District

D135 - Precinct 135 31 District

D144 - Precinct 144 31 District

G103 - Precinct 103 34 District

G104 - Precinct 104 34 District

G106 - Precinct 106 34 District

G107 - Precinct 107 34 District

G108 - Precinct 108 34 District

G109 - Precinct 109 34 District

G111 - Precinct 111 34 District

G112 - Precinct 112 34 District

G116 - Precinct 116 34 District

G117 - Precinct 117 34 District

G119 - Precinct 119 34 District

G120 - Precinct 120 34 District

G121 - Precinct 121 34 District

G122 - Precinct 122 34 District

G123 - Precinct 123 34 District

G124 - Precinct 124 34 District

G126 - Precinct 126 34 District

G129 - Precinct 129 34 District

G147 - Precinct 147 34 District

G148 - Precinct 148 34 District

G149 - Precinct 149 34 District

G151 - Precinct 151 34 District

G154 - Precinct 154 34 District

G155 - Precinct 155 34 District

G166 - Precinct 166 34 District

G167 - Precinct 167 34 District

H103 - Precinct 103 35 District

H110 - Precinct 110 35 District

H111 - Precinct 111 35 District

H112 - Precinct 112 35 District

H113 - Precinct 113 35 District

H116 - Precinct 116 35 District

H118 - Precinct 118 35 District

H150 - Precinct 150 35 District

H151 - Precinct 151 35 District

H152 - Precinct 152 35 District

H157 - Precinct 157 35 District

M140 - Precinct 140 42 District

M141 - Precinct 141 42 District

M142 - Precinct 142 42 District

M143 - Precinct 143 42 District

M150 - Precinct 150 42 District

M162 - Precinct 162 42 District

M163 - Precinct 163 42 District

M165 - Precinct 165 42 District

M174 - Precinct 174 42 District

M175 - Precinct 175 42 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
41, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
41, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
41, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 79, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 41, effective January 20, 2022.

5.242.
Forty-second Representative District.

The Forty-second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

H102 - Precinct 102 35 District

H105 - Precinct 105 35 District

H106 - Precinct 106 35 District

H109 - Precinct 109 35 District

H141 - Precinct 141 35 District

H158 - Precinct 158 35 District

K104 - Precinct 104 40 District

K105 - Precinct 105 40 District

K129 - Precinct 129 40 District

K133 - Precinct 133 40 District

L140 - Precinct 140 41 District

L145 - Precinct 145 41 District

L147 - Precinct 147 41 District

L148 - Precinct 148 41 District

L149 - Precinct 149 41 District

L150 - Precinct 150 41 District

L154 - Precinct 154 41 District

L156 - Precinct 156 41 District

L157 - Precinct 157 41 District

L158 - Precinct 158 41 District

L159 - Precinct 159 41 District

L160 - Precinct 160 41 District

L161 - Precinct 161 41 District

L162 - Precinct 162 41 District

M107 - Precinct 107 42 District

M110 - Precinct 110 42 District

M121 - Precinct 121 42 District

M123 - Precinct 123 42 District

M124 - Precinct 124 42 District

M129 - Precinct 129 42 District

M131 - Precinct 131 42 District

M145 - Precinct 145 42 District

M159 - Precinct 159 42 District

M160 - Precinct 160 42 District

M168 - Precinct 168 42 District

N108 - Precinct 108 43 District

N109 - Precinct 109 43 District

N110 - Precinct 110 43 District

N111 - Precinct 111 43 District

N112 - Precinct 112 43 District

N113 - Precinct 113 43 District

N137 - Precinct 137 43 District

N138 - Precinct 138 43 District

N139 - Precinct 139 43 District

N149 - Precinct 149 43 District

N150 - Precinct 150 43 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
42, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., 1996, ch. 1, §
42, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., 2002, ch. 1, §
42, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 80, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 42, effective January 20, 2022.

5.243.
Forty-third Representative District.

The Forty-third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

H131 - Precinct 131 35 District

H132 - Precinct 132 35 District

H133 - Precinct 133 35 District

L104 - Precinct 104 41 District

L108 - Precinct 108 41 District

L110 - Precinct 110 41 District

L111 - Precinct 111 41 District

L112 - Precinct 112 41 District

L113 - Precinct 113 41 District

L115 - Precinct 115 41 District

L141 - Precinct 141 41 District

L142 - Precinct 142 41 District

L143 - Precinct 143 41 District

L144 - Precinct 144 41 District

L155 - Precinct 155 41 District

L163 - Precinct 163 41 District

L164 - Precinct 164 41 District

M139 - Precinct 139 42 District

M144 - Precinct 144 42 District

M146 - Precinct 146 42 District

M147 - Precinct 147 42 District

M172 - Precinct 172 42 District

N101 - Precinct 101 43 District

N102 - Precinct 102 43 District

N103 - Precinct 103 43 District

N104 - Precinct 104 43 District

N105 - Precinct 105 43 District

N106 - Precinct 106 43 District

N107 - Precinct 107 43 District

N115 - Precinct 115 43 District

N117 - Precinct 117 43 District

N124 - Precinct 124 43 District

N127 - Precinct 127 43 District

N128 - Precinct 128 43 District

N130 - Precinct 130 43 District

N134 - Precinct 134 43 District

N135 - Precinct 135 43 District

N136 - Precinct 136 43 District

N145 - Precinct 145 43 District

N147 - Precinct 147 43 District

N148 - Precinct 148 43 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
43, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
43, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
43, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 81, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 43, effective January 20, 2022.

5.244.
Forty-fourth Representative District.

The Forty-fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

A105 - Precinct 105 28 District

K126 - Precinct 126 40 District

K127 - Precinct 127 40 District

K130 - Precinct 130 40 District

M102 - Precinct 102 42 District

M103 - Precinct 103 42 District

M104 - Precinct 104 42 District

M133 - Precinct 133 42 District

M149 - Precinct 149 42 District

M167 - Precinct 167 42 District

M173 - Precinct 173 42 District

O105 - Precinct 105 44 District

O107 - Precinct 107 44 District

O109 - Precinct 109 44 District

O111 - Precinct 111 44 District

O112 - Precinct 112 44 District

O113 - Precinct 113 44 District

O117 - Precinct 117 44 District

O119 - Precinct 119 44 District

O121 - Precinct 121 44 District

O124 - Precinct 124 44 District

O126 - Precinct 126 44 District

O127 - Precinct 127 44 District

O130 - Precinct 130 44 District

O131 - Precinct 131 44 District

O135 - Precinct 135 44 District

O136 - Precinct 136 44 District

O138 - Precinct 138 44 District

O139 - Precinct 139 44 District

O141 - Precinct 141 44 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
44, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
44, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
44, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 82, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 44, effective January 20, 2022.

5.245.
Forty-fifth Representative District.

The Forty-fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

A138 - The Colony

A157 - Harrods Hill

A158 - Armory

A176 - Sungale

A180 - Beaumont Centre

A182 - Ashbrooke

A188 - Dunbar

A192 - Cardinal Run

A193 - Hemingway

B101 - Clemens Hts.

B117 - Keithshire

B129 - Monticello

B141 - Stone

B142 - Stonewall

B150 - Robinwood

B156 - Bayswater

B163 - Plantation

B172 - Shillito

B183 - Cave Hill

B184 - Palomar

B185 - Scenicview

B186 - Glenview

B187 - Stone Creek

B191 - Waverly

B192 - Palmetto

B199 - Indian Hills

B200 - White Pine

B201 - Harrods View

B203 - Wyndsong

B205 - Blackhorse

B208 - English Station

B212 - Bay Meadows

B213 - Beaver Place

B215 - Copper Creek

B216 - Foleys Trail

B219 - Lee Adams

B222 - Wellington Gardens

B223 - Willow Oak

B225 - Goldon Trophy

B226 - Hollyberry

County: Jessamine KY (part)

D101 - N.E. Us 68

D104 - N.E. Wilmore #1

E101 - North Keene

E102 - Bellerive

E103 - Southland Christian Ch

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
45, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
45, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
45, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 83, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 45, effective January 20, 2022.

5.246.
Forty-sixth Representative District.

The Forty-sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B132 - Precinct 132 29 District

B133 - Precinct 133 29 District

B155 - Precinct 155 29 District

B156 - Precinct 156 29 District

B157 - Precinct 157 29 District

B185 - Precinct 185 29 District

C133 - Precinct 133 30 District

C135 - Precinct 135 30 District

C136 - Precinct 136 30 District

C139 - Precinct 139 30 District

C141 - Precinct 141 30 District

C142 - Precinct 142 30 District

C145 - Precinct 145 30 District

C146 - Precinct 146 30 District

C147 - Precinct 147 30 District

C148 - Precinct 148 30 District

C149 - Precinct 149 30 District

C150 - Precinct 150 30 District

D113 - Precinct 113 31 District

D121 - Precinct 121 31 District

D126 - Precinct 126 31 District

D136 - Precinct 136 31 District

D138 - Precinct 138 31 District

D140 - Precinct 140 31 District

D145 - Precinct 145 31 District

Q103 - Precinct 103 46 District

Q107 - Precinct 107 46 District

Q109 - Precinct 109 46 District

Q115 - Precinct 115 46 District

Q125 - Precinct 125 46 District

Q127 - Precinct 127 46 District

Q132 - Precinct 132 46 District

Q137 - Precinct 137 46 District

Q138 - Precinct 138 46 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
46, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
46, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
46, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 84, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 46, effective January 20, 2022.

5.247.
Forty-seventh Representative District.

The Forty-seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Carroll KY

County: Henry KY

County: Owen KY

County: Trimble KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
47, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
47, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
47, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 85, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 47, effective January 20, 2022.

5.248.
Forty-eighth Representative District.

The Forty-eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

E148 - Precinct 148 32 District

E152 - Precinct 152 32 District

E182 - Precinct 182 32 District

E184 - Precinct 184 32 District

N126 - Precinct 126 43 District

N131 - Precinct 131 43 District

N141 - Precinct 141 43 District

S116 - Precinct 116 48 District

S118 - Precinct 118 48 District

S125 - Precinct 125 48 District

S126 - Precinct 126 48 District

S128 - Precinct 128 48 District

S129 - Precinct 129 48 District

S130 - Precinct 130 48 District

S139 - Precinct 139 48 District

S140 - Precinct 140 48 District

S143 - Precinct 143 48 District

S144 - Precinct 144 48 District

S153 - Precinct 153 48 District

S160 - Precinct 160 48 District

S161 - Precinct 161 48 District

S165 - Precinct 165 48 District

S166 - Precinct 166 48 District

S167 - Precinct 167 48 District

S168 - Precinct 168 48 District

County: Oldham KY (part)

G102 - Briar Hill

G103 - North 22

G105 - Clore

H101 - North Crestwood

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
48, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
48, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
48, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 86, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 48, effective January 20, 2022.

5.249.
Forty-ninth Representative District.

The Forty-ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bullitt KY (part)

A103 - Shepherdsville #3

A104 - Pleasant Grove #4n

A111 - Shepherdsville #3a

A112 - Pleasant Grove 4a

A113 - Shepherdsville #2n

B101 - Mt. Washington #7

B102 - Mt. Washington #8

B103 - Mt. Washington #9

B104 - Mt. Washington #10

B108 - Mt. Washington #8a

B109 - Mt. Washington #7-A

B110 - Mt. Washington #9-North

B112 - Mt. Washington #7b

B113 - Mt. Washington #8-B

B114 - Mt Washington 9c

D102 - Lebanon Junction #15

D103 - Bernheim #16

D105 - Cedar Grove #18

D106 - Bernheim #16a

D107 - Cedar Grove #18a

D110 - Pleasant Grove #4

D111 - Salt River #17a

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
49, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
49, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
49, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 87, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 49, effective January 20, 2022.

5.250.
Fiftieth Representative District.

The Fiftieth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Nelson KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
50, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
50, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
50, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 88, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 50, effective January 20, 2022.

5.251.
Fifty-first Representative District.

The Fifty-first Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Marion KY

County: Taylor KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess)., ch. 5, §
51, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
51, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
51, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 89, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 51, effective January 20, 2022.

5.252.
Fifty-second Representative District.

The Fifty-second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: McCreary KY

County: Pulaski KY (part)

A106 - Firebrook 11f

E101 - Burnside City 36

E103 - Burnside County 36a

E107 - West Burnside County 36w

E108 - Gamblin 37

E109 - Bronston North 38

E111 - Bronston South 38

County: Wayne KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
52, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
52, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
52, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 90, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 52, effective January 20, 2022.

5.253.
Fifty-third Representative District.

The Fifty-third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Anderson KY

County: Spencer KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
53, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
53, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
53, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 91, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 53, effective January 20, 2022.

5.254.
Fifty-fourth Representative District.

The Fifty-fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boyle KY

County: Casey KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
54, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
54, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
54, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 92, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 54, effective January 20, 2022.

5.255.
Fifty-fifth Representative District.

The Fifty-fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jessamine KY (part)

C101 - Sulphur Well

C102 - Little Hickman

D103 - Bethel

D107 - High Bridge

F102 - S.W. Nicholasville #2

F103 - S.W. Nicholasville #3

F104 - S.W. Nicholasville #4

County: Mercer KY

County: Washington KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
55, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
55, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
55, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 93, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 55, effective January 20, 2022.

5.256.
Fifty-sixth Representative District.

The Fifty-sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Franklin KY (part)

B106 - Station Springs

C108 - Forks of Elkhorn

D101 - Swallowfield

D102 - Owenton Rd

D103 - Peaks Mill

D104 - Switzer

D108 - Thorn Hill

County: Jessamine KY (part)

D105 - East Wilmore

D106 - South Wilmore

E104 - N.W. U.S. 68

E105 - Clear Creek

E106 - Northwest Wilmore #1

E107 - North Wilmore

County: Woodford KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
56, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
56, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
56, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 94, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 56, effective January 20, 2022.

5.257.
Fifty-seventh Representative District.

The Fifty-seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Franklin KY (part)

A101 - Farmdale

A102 - Cloverdale

A103 - Vogler-Coleman

A104 - Thistleton

A105 - Bridge-Glenns

A106 - Green Wilson

A107 - Capitol

A108 - Evergreen

B101 - Jett

B102 - Country Club

B103 - Sunset

B105 - Franklin Heights

B108 - Tierra Linda

B109 - Bellview

C101 - Green Hill

C102 - Schenkel Lane

C105 - Arnold

C106 - Scruggs

C107 - Silver Lake

C109 - Ridgeview

C110 - Russell

D105 - Glenwood

D106 - Gains-Holmes

D107 - Crestwood

D109 - Fairview

E101 - Louisville Rd

E102 - South Benson

E108 - Collins Lane

E109 - Westgate

E110 - North Westgate

F101 - Bald Knob

F102 - Courthouse

F103 - St John

F104 - Bellepoint

F105 - Hickory Hills

F106 - Choateville

F108 - Bridgeport-Botkins

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
57, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
57, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
57, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 95, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 57, effective January 20, 2022.

5.258.
Fifty-eighth Representative District.

The Fifty-eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Shelby KY (part)

A101 - West Finchville

A102 - South Shelby

A103 - Charleston

A104 - East Finchville

A105 - Adams Station

B101 - Southville

B102 - Waddy

B103 - Rockbridge

B104 - Weissinger

B105 - Hooper Station

C101 - North East Shelby

C102 - Clayvillage

C103 - East Shelby

C104 - Guist Creek

C105 - Osprey Cove

D101 - East Bagdad

D102 - Cropper

D103 - Jail Hill

D104 - West Bagdad

D105 - Boone Station

E101 - Town N Country

E102 - Marshall Doaks

E103 - North Shelby

E104 - Todds Point

E105 - West Shelby

F101 - Simpsonville

F102 - South Simpsonville

F103 - Garden Station

G101 - Shelbyville #1

G102 - Shelbyville #2

G103 - Shelbyville #3

G104 - Shelbyville #4

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
58, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
58, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
58, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 96, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 58, effective January 20, 2022.

5.259.
Fifty-ninth Representative District.

The Fifty-ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Oldham KY (part)

A101 - North Goshen

A103 - Harmony

A104 - South Harmony

B101 - Skylight

B102 - South Goshen

B104 - West Buckner

B105 - Northeast Buckner

B106 - Covered Bridge

C101 - Covington

C102 - North Lagrange

C103 - Central West

C105 - Westport

C106 - Central East

D101 - Southeast Lagrange

D103 - East Ballardsville

D104 - West Ballardsville

D106 - Main

F101 - West Lagrange

F102 - East Buckner

F103 - Glenarm

F104 - Centerfield

F105 - South Lagrange

F106 - Carriage Hill

G101 - West Brownsboro

H105 - East Brownsboro

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
59, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
59, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
59, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 97, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 59, effective January 20, 2022.

5.260.
Sixtieth Representative District.

The Sixtieth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY (part)

A118 - Hamilton

B115 - Glenview

B117 - Hopeful

B120 - Pleasant Valley

B122 - Union #1

B123 - Union #2

B125 - Union #4

B129 - Union #5

B130 - Union #6

B131 - Summitview

B133 - Florence #15

B135 - Union #7

C102 - Devon #1

C110 - Devon #2

C117 - Devon #3

C121 - Shamrock

C131 - Florence #8 (part)

210150703181000

Click to view

C133 - Florence #10

C134 - Florence #11

C136 - Florence #13

C137 - Florence #14

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
60, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
60, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
60, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 98, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 60, effective January 20, 2022.

5.261.
Sixty-first Representative District.

The Sixty-first Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY (part)

B114 - Beaver

B121 - Richwood

B124 - Union #3

B126 - Verona

County: Gallatin KY

County: Grant KY

County: Kenton KY (part)

B101 - Bracht

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
61, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
61, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
61, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 99, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 61, effective January 20, 2022.

5.262.
Sixty-second Representative District.

The Sixty-second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Scott KY (part)

A100 - Porter

A102 - Sadieville

A104 - Stonehedge

A106 - Mallard Point

A110 - Moonlake

A112 - Eagle Creek

B101 - Colony

B103 - West Stamping Ground

B105 - East Stamping Ground

B109 - Cardinal

B111 - North Stamping Ground

B113 - Derby

C108 - Galloway

C110 - Ironworks

C112 - Lancelot

C114 - West Cane Run

C116 - Fishers Mill

D111 - Oxford

D113 - Cherry Blossom

E118 - Peninsula

E120 - Courthouse

E122 - Ed Davis

E124 - College

F117 - White Oak

F119 - Royal Springs

F121 - Rucker

F123 - Indian Hills

F125 - Bradshaw

F127 - Mcclelland Springs

F129 - Copperfield

F131 - Indian Acres

G128 - Suffoletta

G130 - Southpoint

G132 - Marketplace

G136 - Hambrick Place

HISTORY:

Enact Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
62, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
62, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
62, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 100, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 62, effective January 20, 2022.

5.263.
Sixty-third Representative District.

The Sixty-third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY (part)

A107 - Constance

A119 - Limaburg

B116 - Greenview

B118 - Linkview

B119 - Oakbrook

C123 - Airport

C126 - Florence #3

County: Kenton KY (part)

A105 - Covington #11

A125 - Bromley

A126 - Ludlow #1

A128 - Ludlow #2

C101 - Crescent Springs #1

C102 - Crescent Springs #2

C113 - Erlanger #7

C114 - Erlanger #8

C115 - Erlanger #9

C116 - Ft Mitchell #2

C117 - Ft Mitchell #3

C118 - Ft Mitchell #4

C119 - Ft Mitchell #5

C121 - Ft. Mitchell #7

C127 - Lakeside Park #1

C128 - Lakeside Park #2

C133 - Villa Hills #1

C134 - Villa Hills #2

C135 - Villa Hills #3

C136 - Villa Hills #4

C137 - Villa Hills #5

C138 - Crescent Springs #3

C140 - Ft. Mitchell #1

X001 - X001

X002 - X002

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
63, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
63, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
63, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 101, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 63, effective January 20, 2022.

5.264.
Sixty-fourth Representative District.

The Sixty-fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Kenton KY (part)

A110 - Covington #20

A115 - Covington #26

A116 - Covington #27

A117 - Covington #30

A121 - Covington #36

A122 - Covington #39

A123 - Covington #41

A124 - Covington #42

A130 - Taylor Mill #4

A136 - Taylor Mill #1

A137 - Taylor Mill #2

A138 - Taylor Mill #3

B105 - Decoursey

B115 - Independence #1

B116 - Independence #2

B118 - Independence #4

B122 - Covington #45

B132 - Independence #6

B133 - Independence #7

B136 - Independence #9

B138 - Erlanger #13

B140 - Independence #11

B142 - Decoursey #1.5

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
64, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
64, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
64, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 102, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 64, effective January 20, 2022.

5.265.
Sixty-fifth Representative District.

The Sixty-fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Kenton KY (part)

A101 - Covington #1

A102 - Covington #3

A103 - Covington #7

A104 - Covington #10

A106 - Covington #12

A107 - Covington #13

A108 - Covington #15

A109 - Covington #19

A111 - Covington #21

A112 - Covington #23

A113 - Covington #24

A114 - Covington #25

A118 - Covington #31

A119 - Covington #33

A120 - Covington #34

A131 - Covington #43

A132 - Park Hills #1

A133 - Park Hills #2

A135 - Covington #44

B106 - Edgewood #1

B107 - Edgewood #2

B108 - Edgewood #3

B110 - Edgewood #5

B111 - Edgewood #6

B112 - Edgewood #7

C122 - Ft Wright #1

C124 - Ft Wright #2

C125 - Ft Wright #3

C131 - Crestview Hills #2

C143 - Ft. Wright #4.5

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
65, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
65, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
65, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 103, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 65, effective January 20, 2022.

5.266.
Sixty-sixth Representative District.

The Sixty-sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY (part)

A102 - Belleview

A103 - Bullittsville

A104 - Burlington #1

A105 - Burlington #2

A106 - Carlton

A108 - Hebron #1

A109 - Hebron #2

A110 - Petersburg

A111 - Burlington #3

A112 - Burlington #4

A113 - Burlington #5

A114 - Hebron #3

A115 - Burlington #6

A116 - Burlington #7

A117 - Hebron #4

A120 - Burlington #8

A121 - Hebron #5

A122 - Burlington #9

A123 - Camp Ernst

B132 - Hearthstone

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
66, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
66, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
66, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 104, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 66, effective January 20, 2022.

5.267.
Sixty-seventh Representative District.

The Sixty-seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Campbell KY (part)

A412 - Ft Thomas N

A419 - Ft Thomas S

A502 - Southgate B

A503 - Southgate C

A504 - Southgate D

A602 - Highland Hts B

A603 - Highland Hts C

A604 - Highland Hts D

A605 - Highland Hts E

B704 - Cold Spring D

B909 - Johns Hill

B913 - Wilder

C101 - Dayton A

C102 - Dayton B

C103 - Dayton C

C201 - Bellevue A

C202 - Bellevue B

C203 - Bellevue C

C204 - Bellevue D

C301 - Newport A

C302 - Newport B

C303 - Newport C

C304 - Newport D

C305 - Newport E

C306 - Newport F

C307 - Newport G

C308 - Newport H

C309 - Newport I

C310 - Newport J

C311 - Newport K

C416 - Ft Thomas J

C501 - Southgate A

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
67, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
67, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
67, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 105, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 67, effective January 20, 2022.

5.268.
Sixty-eighth Representative District.

The Sixty-eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Campbell KY (part)

A402 - Ft Thomas B

A403 - Ft Thomas C

A405 - Ft Thomas E

A406 - Ft Thomas F

A408 - Ft Thomas H

A409 - Ft Thomas K

A410 - Ft Thomas L

A411 - Ft Thomas M

A414 - Ft Thomas P

A415 - Ft Thomas I

A417 - Ft Thomas T

A418 - Ft Thomas R

A601 - Highland Hts A

A701 - Cold Spring A

A703 - Cold Spring C

A801 - Alexandria A

A802 - Alexandria B

A803 - Alexandria C

A804 - Alexandria D

B702 - Cold Spring B

B705 - Cold Spring E

B706 - Cold Spring F

B805 - Alexandria E

B806 - Alexandria F

B901 - Mentor

B902 - California

B903 - Sun Valley

B906 - Camp Springs

B907 - Ross

B910 - Melbourne

B912 - Silver Grove

C401 - Ft Thomas A

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
68, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
68, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
68, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 106, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 68, effective January 20, 2022.

5.269.
Sixty-ninth Representative District.

The Sixty-ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY (part)

C124 - Florence #1

C125 - Florence #2

C127 - Florence #4

C128 - Florence #5

C129 - Florence #6

C130 - Florence #7

C131 - Florence #8 (part)

210150702022006, 210150702022012, 210150702022013, 210150702022014, 210150703011004, 210150703011005, 210150703011006, 210150703121010, 210150703121011, 210150703151000, 210150703151001, 210150703151003, 210150703151004, 210150703151005, 210150703151009, 210150703151010, 210150703151011, 210150703151012, 210150703151013, 210150703151014, 210150703151015, 210150703151016, 210150703151019, 210150703151020, 210150703151021, 210150703152006, 210150703152007, 210150703152008

Click to view

C132 - Florence #9

C135 - Florence #12

County: Kenton KY (part)

B117 - Independence #3

B125 - Erlanger #11

B131 - Independence #5

B134 - Independence #8

B135 - Erlanger #12

B139 - Edgewood #1.5

C103 - Elsmere #1

C104 - Elsmere #2

C105 - Elsmere #3

C106 - Elsmere #4

C107 - Erlanger #1

C108 - Erlanger #2

C109 - Erlanger #3

C110 - Erlanger #4

C111 - Erlanger #5

C112 - Erlanger #6

C130 - Crestview Hills #1

C139 - Elsmere #5

C141 - Erlanger #10

C142 - Crescent Springs #3.5

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
69, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
69, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
69, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 107, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 69, effective January 20, 2022.

5.270.
Seventieth Representative District.

The Seventieth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bracken KY

County: Harrison KY

County: Mason KY

County: Robertson KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
70, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
70, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
70, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 108, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 70, effective January 20, 2022.